Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9A.48.100 and 2013 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:For the purposes of RCW 9A.48.070 through 9A.48.090 inclusive:(1) "Physical damage," in addition to its ordinary meaning, shall include the total or partial alteration, damage, obliteration, or erasure of records, information, data, computer programs, or their computer representations, which are recorded for use in computers or the impairment, interruption, or interference with the use of such records, information, data, or computer programs, or the impairment, interruption, or interference with the use of any computer or services provided by computers. "Physical damage" also includes any diminution in the value of any property as the consequence of an act and the cost to repair any physical damage;(2) If more than one item of property is physically damaged as a result of a common scheme or plan by a person and the physical damage to the property would, when considered separately, constitute mischief in the third degree because of value, then the value of the damages may be aggregated in one count. If the sum of the value of all the physical damages exceeds ((two hundred fifty dollars))$750, the defendant may be charged with and convicted of malicious mischief in the second degree.Sec. 2. RCW 7.80.070 and 2006 c 270 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A notice of civil infraction represents a determination that a civil infraction has been committed. The determination is final unless contested as provided in this chapter.(2) The form for the notice of civil infraction shall be prescribed by rule of the supreme court and shall include the following:(a) A statement that the notice represents a determination that a civil infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and that the determination is final unless contested as provided in this chapter;(b) A statement that a civil infraction is a noncriminal offense for which imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction;(c) A statement of the specific civil infraction for which the notice was issued;(d) A statement of the monetary penalty established for the civil infraction;(e) A statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;(f) A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination the state has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the civil infraction was committed and that the person may subpoena witnesses including the enforcement officer who issued the notice of civil infraction;(g) A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the civil infraction, the person will be deemed to have committed the civil infraction and may not subpoena witnesses;(h) A statement that the person must respond to the notice as provided in this chapter within ((fifteen))30 days of the date the notice is personally served or, if the notice is served by mail, within 33 days of the date the notice is mailed;(i) A statement that failure to respond to the notice or a failure to appear at a hearing requested for the purpose of contesting the determination or for the purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances will result in a default judgment against the person in the amount of the penalty and that this failure may be referred to the prosecuting attorney for criminal prosecution for failure to respond or appear;(j) A statement that failure to respond to a notice of civil infraction or to appear at a requested hearing is a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine or imprisonment in jail.Sec. 3. RCW 7.80.050 and 1987 c 456 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A civil infraction proceeding is initiated by the issuance, service, and filing of a notice of civil infraction.(2) A notice of civil infraction may be issued by an enforcement officer when the civil infraction occurs in the officer's presence.(3) A court may issue a notice of civil infraction if an enforcement officer files with the court a written statement that the civil infraction was committed in the officer's presence or that the officer has reasonable cause to believe that a civil infraction was committed.(4) Service of a notice of civil infraction issued under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be as provided by court rule. Until such a rule is adopted, service shall be as provided in ((JTIR))IRLJ 2.2(c)(1) and (3), as applicable.(5) A notice of infraction shall be filed with a court having jurisdiction within ((forty-eight hours))five days of issuance, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. ((A))In the absence of good cause shown, a notice of infraction not filed within the time limits prescribed in this section ((may))shall, upon motion, be dismissed without prejudice.Sec. 4. RCW 7.80.120 and 2024 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person found to have committed a civil infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty.(a) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 1 civil infraction shall be $250, not including statutory assessments, except for an infraction of state law involving (i) potentially dangerous litter as specified in RCW 70A.200.060(((4)))(5), in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $500; or (ii) a person's refusal to submit to a test or tests pursuant to RCW 79A.60.040 and 79A.60.700, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $1,000; or (iii) the misrepresentation of service animals under RCW 49.60.214, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $500; or (iv) untraceable firearms pursuant to RCW 9.41.326 or unfinished frames or receivers pursuant to RCW 9.41.327, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $500; or (v) the failure to report the loss or theft of a firearm under RCW 9.41.368, in which case the maximum penalty and default amount is $1,000;(b) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 2 civil infraction shall be $125, not including statutory assessments;(c) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 3 civil infraction shall be $50, not including statutory assessments; and(d) The maximum penalty and the default amount for a class 4 civil infraction shall be $25, not including statutory assessments.(2) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines for civil infractions.(3)(a) Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court may grant an extension of the period in which the penalty may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for payment, the court may proceed to collect the penalty in the same manner as other civil judgments and may notify the prosecuting authority of the failure to pay.(b) A person may request a payment plan at any time for the payment of any monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation associated with an infraction.(i) Mandatory. If the court determines that the person does not have the ability to pay the monetary obligation in full, the person has not previously been granted a payment plan for the same monetary obligation, and the court has not authorized its collections agency to take civil legal enforcement action, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the individual.(ii) Discretionary. Where the court has authorized its collections agency to take civil legal enforcement action, the court may, at its discretion, enter into a payment plan.(4) The court may also order a person found to have committed a civil infraction to make restitution.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. RCW 2.56.190 (Legal financial obligationsâCollectionâDistribution of funds) and 2003 c 379 s 21 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW to read as follows:By October 1st of each year, the state treasurer shall distribute such funds to counties for county clerk collection budgets as are appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, using the funding formula recommended by the Washington association of county officials.--- END ---